Massachusetts, session 194th, S2652.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the city of
Taunton may establish a uniform, separate billing rate for municipal water service supplied
within Taunton to manufactured housing communities, as defined in section 32F of chapter 140
of the General Laws. The separate billing rate shall: (i) not charge for water service on a
descending unit rate basis; (ii) only apply to such communities or portions thereof that receive a
single invoice for all usage therein based on a master water meter; and (iii) not apply to
manufactured homes that are individually metered by the city.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1